Alabama, session 2026rs, HB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"written prescription" includes paper prescriptions via manual
transmission and electronic prescriptions via direct
transmission to a pharmacy.
(b) A licensed veterinarian may not refuse to provide a
written prescription to a client upon the client's request to
do so if:
(1) In the licensed veterinarian's medical opinion, the
prescription medication is medically safe for in-home
administration by the owner; and
(2) A valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship
exists.
(c) Before dispensing a prescription medication, a
licensed veterinarian, or an authorized member of the
veterinary staff, shall clearly inform a client that:
(1) The client may request to receive a written
prescription for the medication that may be filled at a
pharmacy of the client's choice; and
(2) If the veterinary facility is able to fill the
prescription, the client may have the prescription filled at
the facility.
(d) All veterinary facilities shall post a clear and
Page 2

(d) All veterinary facilities shall post a clear and
HB616 INTRODUCED
conspicuous sign near the primary public entrance or at the
primary point of sale or checkout that substantially states
the following:
"UNDER ALABAMA LAW, A VETERINARY CLIENT MAY RECEIVE A
WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION FROM HIS OR HER VETERINARIAN UPON REQUEST
THAT MAY BE FILLED BY A PHARMACY OF HIS OR HER CHOOSING."
(e) This section does not apply if:
(1) In the determination of a licensed veterinarian,
immediate dispensing of medication is necessary to preserve
the life or prevent the suffering of a patient; or
(2) The prescription is for a medication for which
dispensing is restricted by federal or state law.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3